Illinois, session 104th, HB3351.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Rental 5Age Protection Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Automobile rental company" means a person or entity whose 8primary business is renting motor vehicles to the public for 930 days or less. 10    "Lodging establishment" means any building or buildings 11maintained, advertised, and held out to the public to be a 12place where lodging is offered for consideration to travelers 13and guests. "Lodging establishment" includes hotels, inns, 14motels, tourist homes or courts, and lodging houses. 15    "Motor vehicle" means a motor vehicle as defined in the 16Illinois Vehicle Code that a person with a Class D driver's 17license may operate.18    "Person" means a natural person, corporation, partnership, 19trust, or other entity, and in the case of an entity, it shall 20include any other entity in which it has a majority interest or 21which it effectively controls as well as the individual 22officers, directors, and other persons in active control of 23the activities of each such entity.   HB3351- 2 -LRB104 12190 SPS 22293 b1    Section 10. Automobile rental companies. It is unlawful 2for an automobile rental company to refuse to rent a motor 3vehicle to any person 18 years of age or older on the basis of 4age if insurance coverage for a person of that age is 5available. An automobile rental company may not charge a 6person any extra costs for insurance based solely on the age of 7the person renting the motor vehicle. Nothing in this Section 8prohibits an automobile rental company from requiring a person 9to provide documentation confirming the age of that person 10before entering into a rental agreement. 11    Section 15. Lodging establishments. It is unlawful for a 12lodging establishment to refuse to rent a room to any person 18 13years of age or older on the basis of age or charge a person a 14higher rate than the regular rate charged to rent a room on the 15basis of age. Nothing in this Section prohibits a lodging 16establishment from requiring a person to provide documentation 17confirming the age of that person before entering into a 18rental agreement. 19    Section 20. Enforcement by Attorney General. A violation 20of any of the provisions of this Act is an unlawful practice 21under the Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business Practices Act. 22All remedies, penalties, and authority granted to the Attorney 23General by that Act shall be available to him or her for the   HB3351- 3 -LRB104 12190 SPS 22293 b1enforcement of this Act. 2    Section 90. The Renter's Financial Responsibility and 3Protection Act is amended by changing Section 10 as follows: 4    (625 ILCS 27/10)5    Sec. 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:6    "Rental Company" means a person or entity that rents 7private passenger vehicles to the public for 30 days or less.8    "Renter" means a person or entity that obtains the use of a 9private passenger vehicle from a rental company under terms of 10a rental agreement.11    "Rental Agreement" means an agreement for 30 days or less 12setting forth the terms and conditions governing the use of a 13private passenger vehicle provided by a rental company.14    "Authorized Driver" means: the renter; the renter's spouse 15if the spouse is a licensed driver and satisfies the rental 16company's minimum age requirement; the renter's employer, 17employee, or co-worker if that person is a licensed driver, 18satisfies the rental company's minimum age requirement, and at 19the time of the rental is engaged in a business activity with 20the renter; any person who is expressly listed by the rental 21company on the rental agreement as an authorized driver; and 22any person driving directly to a medical or police facility 23under circumstances reasonably believed to constitute an 24emergency and who is a licensed driver.  HB3351- 4 -LRB104 12190 SPS 22293 b1    "Damage Waiver" means a rental company's agreement not to 2hold an authorized driver liable for all or a part of any 3damage to or loss of a rented vehicle for which the renter may 4be liable pursuant to Section 6-305.2. "Damage Waiver" shall 5encompass within its meaning other similar terms used by 6rental companies, such as "Collision Damage Waiver", "Loss 7Damage Waiver", "Physical Damage Waiver", and the like.8(Source: P.A. 90-113, eff. 7-14-97.) 9    Section 95. The Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 10Practices Act is amended by adding Section 2HHHH as follows: 11    (815 ILCS 505/2HHHH new)12    Sec. 2HHHH. Violations of the Rental Age Protection Act. A 13person who violates the Rental Age Protection Act commits an 14unlawful practice within the meaning of this Act.